Utah statutes.
58-60-403.   Board.

(1)  There is created the Clinical Mental Health Counselor Licensing Board consisting of four clinical mental health counselors and one member from the general public.

(2)  The board shall be appointed, serve terms, and be compensated in accordance with Section 58-1-201.

(3)  The duties and responsibilities of the board are in accordance with Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203.  In addition, the board shall:

(a)  designate one of its members on a permanent or rotating basis to assist the division in review of complaints concerning unlawful or unprofessional practice by a licensee in the profession regulated by  the board and to advise the division with respect to the conduct of investigations of the complaints; and

(b)  disqualify any member from acting as presiding officer in any administrative procedure in which that member has previously reviewed the complaint or advised the division.



Amended by Chapter 179, 2012 General Session

